Massachusetts, session 194th, H4251.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. To provide for supplementing certain items in the general appropriation act
for fiscal year 2026, the sums set forth in section 2A are hereby appropriated from the General
Fund unless specifically designated otherwise in this act, for the several purposes and subject to
the conditions specified in this act, and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public
funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. These sums shall be in addition to any amounts
previously appropriated and made available for the purposes of those items. These sums shall be
made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2A.
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
of 6

Reserves
1599-1690 For a reserve to fund necessary costs to the commonwealth and respond to
federal policy actions in fiscal year 2026; provided, that the secretary of administration and
finance may transfer funds from this item to other items, as needed; and provided further, that
not less than 15 days before making any such transfers, the secretary shall notify the house and
senate committees on ways and means on: (i) the item receiving the transfer; (ii) the amount
being transferred; and (iii) details on the need requiring the transfer……………... $100,000,000
OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER
Executive Office of Housing and Livable Communities
1595-0604 For an operating transfer to the Housing Stabilization and Preservation
Trust Fund established in chapter 121B of the General Laws…………………….. $30,000,000
SECTION 3. Subsection (a) of section 24N of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as
amended by section 111 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the
definition of “routine childhood immunizations” and inserting in place thereof the following
definition:-
“Routine childhood immunizations”, immunizations for children until their nineteenth
birthday as determined by the commissioner.
SECTION 4. Subsection (c) of said section 24N of said chapter 111, as so amended, is
hereby amended by striking out the last 5 sentences and inserting in place thereof the following 6
sentences:- The council shall recommend the list of routine childhood immunizations, including
types of vaccines to be purchased and shall take into account provider preference, cost,
of 6

availability and other factors as determined by the council. The commissioner shall recommend
the amount of funding needed each fiscal year by calculating the total non-federal program cost.
The council shall make recommendations to the commissioner on whether the commissioner
may authorize provider choice of more than 1 comparable brand or type for a routine childhood
immunization vaccine. In its recommendations, the council shall examine the feasibility, costs
and benefits of authorizing provider choice, provide a schedule of the cost of each comparable
brand or type of a vaccine recommended for provider choice and demonstrate that the estimated
vaccine cost of authorizing provider choice would not be substantially greater than the estimated
vaccine cost of purchasing a single brand or type of a vaccine. The commissioner of public
health shall determine the final list of routine childhood immunizations and vaccines to be
purchased. The council shall also consider other vaccine related questions presented by the
commissioner.
SECTION 5. Subsection (f) of said section 24N of said chapter 111, as so amended, is
hereby amended by striking out the words “Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of
the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention” and inserting in place thereof the following
word:- commissioner.
SECTION 6. Item 7002-1522 of section 2 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
amended by striking out, in line item 7002-1522, the words “developed with the assistance of”
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- , with preference for companies receiving.
SECTION 7. Item 7002-1523 of said section 2 of said chapter 238 is hereby amended by
striking out, the words “ developed with the assistance of” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- , with preference for companies receiving.
of 6

SECTION 8. Notwithstanding section 6 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, for the plan
year beginning in fiscal year 2026, the group insurance commission may alter the schedule of
copayments and deductibles for health plans, or alter any other terms relating to health plans
which would require authorization by vote of the commissioners during the current year.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
2026, the secretary of housing and livable communities, with the written approval of the
secretary of administration and finance, may authorize transfers of surplus among items 7004-
0001, 7004-0099, 7004-0100, , 7004-0102, 7004-0104, 7004-0105, 7004-0106, 7004-0107,
7004-0108, 7004-0109, 7004-0202, 7004-3036, 7004-3045, 7004-4314, 7004-9005, 7004-9007,
7004-9024, 7004-9030, 7004-9031, 7004-9032, 7004-9033, 7004-9034, 7004-9315, 7004-9316
and 7004-9323, as necessary.
SECTION 10. For fiscal year 2026, the secretary of administration and finance may
authorize any of the following actions; provided, that the secretary of administration and finance
shall provide notice at least 15 days in advance to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing the need for such action pursuant to this section:
(i) in addition to the powers authorized under section 9C of chapter 29 of the General
Laws, whenever the secretary of administration and finance certifies that, in fiscal year 2026: (A)
revenue collections for the fiscal year are at least $400,000,000 under the consensus revenue
benchmarks determined by the department of revenue; or (B) federal policy changes have
resulted in a material negative impact of at least $400,000,000 on the fiscal year 2026 General
Appropriations Act such that budgeted revenues shall be insufficient to meet all expenditures
authorized in chapter 9 of the acts of 2025; the power of the secretary of administration and
of 6

finance to allot funds under section 9B of chapter 29 of the General Laws shall extend to any
monies appropriated by the general court under said chapter 9 of the acts of 2025 and the
governor may reduce said allotments; provided, that the procedures set forth in said section 9C
shall apply to any such further allotment reduction under this subsection;
(ii) notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, authorize the transfer of
funds from any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 for any executive branch agency to any
other item of appropriation for that agency or within its executive office; provided that no
transfer authorized by this section shall exceed 5 per cent of the amount appropriated for an item;
and, provided further that the transfer may be made only with the written approval of the heads
of the sending and receiving agencies, of the secretary of the executive office of each agency
involved in the transfer and the secretary of administration and finance; and
(iii) authorize the Massachusetts Department of Transportation to include certain salaries
of employees in the department's capital expenditures if such employees are assigned to a capital
project or projects in the department’s 5-year capital investment plan for the fiscal years 2026
through 2030, inclusive, notwithstanding the provisions of section 15 of chapter 6C of the
General Laws; provided that prior to the inclusion of any salaries in capital expenditures under
this clause, the department shall submit a plan for the approval of the secretary of administration
and finance, including: (A) the total amount of salary expenses to be included by the department
in capital expenditures; (B) the total number of department employee salaries included in capital
expenditures, including a breakdown by division of the position titles, description of capital
project-related job responsibilities, and accompanying salaries; (C) the total number of
employees of the department assigned to capital projects; (D) a schedule of transportation capital
projects where employee salaries are included in capital expenditures; (E) the status of said
of 6

capital projects; (F) any projected cost savings; (G) the impact of including department employee
salaries in capital expenditures on the ability of the department to plan, design, construct and
100 complete transportation capital projects; and (H) a plan, not to exceed 36 months from the date
101 of the plan or the completion date of the capital project to which each listed position is
102 committed, whichever is longer, to restore the salaries related to such positions to the operating
103 budget; provided further, that the department shall prepare a report including items (A) through
104 (G), inclusive, and submit it to the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means
105 and the chairs of the joint committee on transportation no later than 30 days after the approval of
106 a plan by the secretary.
of 6